Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 1

General Provisions

43-38-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Processing Cooperative Law.”

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 1.

43-38-102. Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The general assembly has the power to amend or repeal all or part of this chapter at any time and all domestic cooperatives subject to this chapter shall be governed by the amendment or repeal.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 1.

43-38-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Address” means mailing address, including a zip code. In the case of a registered address, the term means the mailing address and the actual office location, which may not be a post office box;

“Articles” or “articles of organization” means articles of organization as originally filed and subsequently amended;

“Association” means an organization conducting business under a cooperative plan under the laws of this state;

“Board” or “board of directors” means the board of directors of a cooperative;

“Business entity” means a corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership or other legal entity, association or body vested with the power or function of a legal entity;

“Bylaws” means a written agreement described in § 43-38-301 among the members concerning the cooperative;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Cooperative” means an association organized under this title conducting business on a cooperative plan as provided under this chapter;

“Distribution” means a direct or indirect transfer of money or other property, except its own membership interests, with or without consideration, or an incurrence or issuance of indebtedness, whether directly or indirectly, including through a guaranty, by a cooperative to or for the benefit of any of its members in respect of membership interests. A distribution may be in the form of an interim distribution or a liquidation distribution; a purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of its membership interests; a distribution of indebtedness, which includes the incurrence of indebtedness, whether directly or indirectly, including through a guaranty, for the benefit of the members, or otherwise;

“Domestic business entity” means a business entity organized under the laws of this state;

“Filed with the secretary of state” means that a document meeting the applicable requirements of this chapter, signed and accompanied by the required filing fee, has been delivered to the secretary of state of this state. The secretary of state shall endorse on the document the word “Filed” or a similar word determined by the secretary of state and the month, day, and year of filing, record the document in the office of the secretary of state, and return the document to the person or entity who delivered it for filing;

“Financial rights” means a member's right to:

Share in profits and losses as provided in §§ 43-38-901 and 43-38-902; and

Share in distributions as provided in §§ 43-38-901 and 43-38-902;

“Governance rights” means a right to vote on one (1) or more matters and all a member's rights as a member in the cooperative other than financial rights;

“Majority” means, with respect to a vote of the members, if voting on a per capita basis, a majority in number of the members entitled to vote on a specific matter, or if the voting is determined otherwise, a majority of the voting interest, which may be expressed as a percentage, entitled to vote on a specific matter, and with respect to a vote of the directors, a majority in number of the directors entitled to vote on a specific matter;

“Member” means a person or entity reflected on the books of the cooperative as the owner of governance rights of a membership interest of the cooperative and includes patron and nonpatron members;

“Membership interest” means a member's interest in a cooperative consisting of a member's financial rights, a member's right to assign financial rights, a member's governance rights and a member's right to assign governance rights. Membership interest includes patron membership interests and nonpatron membership interests;

“Members' meeting” means a regular or special members' meeting;

“Nonpatron membership interest” means a membership interest that does not require the holder to conduct patronage business for or with the cooperative to receive financial rights or distributions;

“Patron” means a person or entity who conducts patronage business with the cooperative;

“Patron member” means a member holding a patron membership interest;

“Patron membership interest” means the membership interest requiring the holder to conduct patronage business for or with the cooperative, as specified by the cooperative to receive financial rights or distributions;

“Patronage” means business, transactions, or services done for or with the cooperative as defined by the cooperative;

“Required records” are those records required to be maintained under § 43-38-118;

“Secretary of state” means the person who holds the office of secretary of state of Tennessee. A filing with the secretary of state occurs by a proper filing with the office of the secretary of state. An action required by the secretary of state may be performed by employees or agents of the office of the secretary of state;

“Signed” means that the signature of a person has been written on a document, and, with respect to a document required by this chapter to be filed with the secretary of state, means that the document has been signed by a person authorized to do so by this chapter, the articles or bylaws, or by a resolution approved by the directors or the members. A signature on a document may be a facsimile affixed, engraved, printed, placed, stamped with indelible ink, transmitted by facsimile or electronically or in any other manner reproduced on the document;

“Surviving entity” means the entity resulting from a merger;

“Termination” means the end of a cooperative's existence as a legal entity and occurs when the articles of termination are filed with the secretary of state under § 43-38-1014 or is considered filed with the secretary of state under § 43-38-122; and

“Written action” means a written document signed by those persons required to take the action described.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 2.

43-38-104. Notice.

Notice under this chapter shall be in writing, except that oral notice is effective if it is reasonable under the circumstances and not prohibited by the articles or bylaws.

Notice may be communicated in person, by telephone, telegraph, teletype, or other form of wire or wireless communication, or by mail or private carrier. If these forms of personal notice are impracticable, notice may be communicated by a newspaper of general circulation in the area where published, or by radio, television, or other form of public broadcast communication.

Written notice by a domestic cooperative to its members, if in a comprehensible form, is effective when mailed, if mailed postpaid and correctly addressed to the member's address shown in the cooperative's current record of members.

Written notice to a domestic cooperative may be addressed to its registered agent at its registered office or to the cooperative or its secretary at its principal office shown in its most recent annual report.

Except as provided in subsection (c), written notice, if in a comprehensible form, is effective at the earliest of the following:

When received;

Five (5) days after its deposit in the United States mail, if mailed correctly addressed and with first class postage affixed;

On the date shown on the return receipt, if sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the receipt is signed by or on behalf of the addressee; or

Twenty (20) days after its deposit in the United States mail, as evidenced by the postmark if mailed correctly addressed, and with other than first class, registered or certified postage affixed.

Oral notice is effective when communicated if communicated in a comprehensible manner.

If this chapter prescribes notice requirements for particular circumstances, those requirements govern. If the articles or bylaws prescribe notice requirements not inconsistent with this section or other provisions of this chapter, those requirements govern.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 3.

43-38-105. Name of cooperative.

The name of a cooperative shall distinguish the cooperative upon the records in the office of the secretary of state from the name of a domestic or foreign business entity, authorized or registered to do business in this state or a name the right to which is, at the time of organization, reserved or provided for by law.

A cooperative may apply to the secretary of state for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon the secretary of state's records from one (1) or more of the names described in subsection (a). The secretary of state shall authorize use of the indistinguishable name applied for if:

The other cooperative or business entity consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state to waive its reservation or change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the name of the applying cooperative;

The applicant delivers to the secretary of state a certified copy of the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant's right to use the name applied for in this state; or

The other cooperative or business entity is under common control with the cooperative, consents to the use in writing, and both the other cooperative or business entity and the applicant consent in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state to use the same registered agent.

A domestic cooperative may elect to adopt an assumed name that complies with the requirements of subsections (a) and (b).

As used in this chapter, “assumed name” means any name used by the cooperative, other than the cooperative true name, except that the following shall not constitute the use of an assumed name:

The identification by a cooperative of its business with a trademark or service mark of which it is the owner or licensed user; and

The use of a name of a division, not separately organized; provided, that the cooperative also clearly discloses its name.

Before transacting any business in this state under an assumed name or names, the cooperative shall, for each assumed name, pursuant to resolution by its board of directors, execute and file in accordance with §§ 43-38-1101 and 43-38-1103, an application setting forth:

The true cooperative name;

The state or country under the laws of which it is organized;

That it intends to transact business under an assumed name; and

The assumed name that it proposes to use.

The right to use an assumed name shall be effective for five (5) years from the date of filing by the secretary of state. A cooperative may reserve or use no more than five (5) assumed names during the same period.

A cooperative shall renew the right to use its assumed name or names, if any, within the two (2) months preceding the expiration of such right, for a period of five (5) years, by filing an application to renew each assumed name and paying the renewal fee as prescribed by § 43-38-1103(a).

Any domestic cooperative may, pursuant to resolution by its governing body, change or cancel any or all of its assumed names by executing and filing, in accordance with §§ 43-38-1101 and 43-38-1103, an application setting forth:

The true cooperative name;

The state or country under the laws of which it is organized;

That it intends to cease transacting business under an assumed name by changing or canceling it;

The assumed name to be changed from or cancelled; and

If the assumed name is to be changed, the assumed cooperative name that the cooperative proposes to use.

Upon the filing of an application to change an assumed name, the cooperative shall have the right to use such assumed name for the period authorized by subsection (b).

The right to a domestic cooperative to use an assumed name shall be cancelled by the secretary of state if:

The cooperative fails to renew an assumed name;

The cooperative has filed an application to change or cancel an assumed name; or

A domestic cooperative has been dissolved.

Nothing in this section or in § 43-38-106 shall abrogate or limit the law as to unfair competition or unfair trade practice, or derogate from the common law, the principles of equity, or the statutes of this state or of the United States with respect to the right to acquire and protect trade names and trademarks.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 7.

43-38-106. Reservation of cooperative name with secretary of state.

A person may reserve the exclusive use of a cooperative name, including an assumed cooperative name, by delivering an application to the secretary of state for filing. The application must set forth the name and address of the applicant and the name proposed to be reserved. If the secretary of state finds that the cooperative name applied for meets the requirements of § 43-38-105 and is available, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for the applicant's exclusive use for a four-month period. Upon the expiration of the four-month period, the same or any other party may apply to reserve the same name.

The owner of a reserved cooperative name, including an assumed cooperative name, may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the secretary of state a notice of the transfer signed by the owner that states the name and address of the transferee.

The reservation of a specific name may be cancelled by filing with the secretary of state a notice, executed by the applicant or transferee, specifying the name reservation to be cancelled and the name and address of the applicant or transferee.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 7.

43-38-107. Registered office and registered agent.

Each cooperative shall have and continuously maintain in this state:

A registered office, which may be, but need not be, the same as its place of business;

A registered agent, which agent may be either an individual resident in this state whose business office is identical with the registered office, or a domestic or foreign business entity authorized to transact business in the state having a business office identical with the registered office.

If a registered agent resigns or is unable to perform the agent's duties, the domestic cooperative shall promptly designate another registered agent to the end that it shall at all times have a registered agent in this state.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 8.

43-38-108. Change of registered office or registered agent.

A cooperative may change its registered office or agent, or both, upon filing in the office of the secretary of state a statement of change setting forth:

The name of the cooperative;

If the address of its current registered office is to be changed, the address to which the registered office is to be changed, and the zip code for the office, and the county in which the office is located;

If its current registered agent is to be changed, the name of its new registered agent; and

That the address of its registered office and the address of the business office of its registered agent, as changed, will be identical.

If a registered agent changes the street address of the registered agent's business office, the registered agent may change the street address of the registered office of any cooperative for which that registered agent is the registered agent by notifying the cooperative in writing of the change, either manually or in facsimile, and delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement that companies with the requirement of subsection (a) and states that the cooperative has been notified of the change. The statement shall be signed and delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the statement conforms to this chapter, the secretary of state shall file the statement in the secretary of state's office, and upon filing the change of address of the registered office or the appointment of a new registered agent or both, as the case may be is effective.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 8.

43-38-109. Resignation of registered agent.

Any registered agent of a cooperative may resign as the registered agent's agency appointment by signing and filing with the secretary of state an original statement of resignation accompanied by the registered agent's certification that the registered agent has mailed a copy of the original statement of resignation to the principal office by certified mail.

The agency appointment is terminated, and the registered office discontinued, if so provided, on the date on which the statement is filed by the secretary of state.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 8.

43-38-110. Service on cooperative.

A domestic cooperative's registered agent is the cooperative's agent for service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the cooperative.

Whenever a domestic cooperative fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this state, or whenever its registered agent cannot be found with reasonable diligence, then the secretary of state shall be an agent of such cooperative on whom any such process, notice or demand may be served.

This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of service on a domestic cooperative.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 8.

43-38-111. Service — Role of secretary of state.

Service on the secretary of state, when the secretary of state is an agent for a domestic cooperative as provided in § 43-38-110(b), of any process, notice or demand shall be made by delivering to the office of the secretary of state the original and one (1) copy of such process, notice, or demand, duly certified by the clerk of the court in which the suit or action is pending or brought, together with the proper fee. A statement that identifies which of the grounds, as listed in § 43-38-104(b), for service on the secretary of state is applicable, must be included. The office of the secretary of state shall endorse the time of receipt upon the original and copy and immediately shall send the copy, along with a written notice that service of the original was also made, by registered or certified mail, with return receipt requested, addressed to the cooperative at its registered office or principal office as shown in the records on file in the secretary of state's office or as shown in the official registry of the state or country in which the cooperative is organized. If none of the previously mentioned addresses is available to the secretary of state, service may be made on any one (1) of the organizers at the address set forth in the articles. The secretary of state may require the plaintiff, or complainant, as the case may be, or plaintiff's attorney to furnish the latter address.

The refusal or failure of a cooperative to accept delivery of the registered or certified mail provided for in subsection (a), or the refusal or failure to sign the return receipt, shall not affect the validity of such service; and any such cooperative refusing or failing to accept delivery of such registered or certified mail shall be charged with knowledge of the contents of any process, notice or demand contained in the registered or certified mail.

When the registered or certified mail return receipt is received by the office of the secretary of state or when a domestic cooperative refuses or fails to accept delivery of the registered or certified mail and it is returned to the office of the secretary of state, the office of the secretary of state shall forward the receipt or the refused or undelivered mail to the clerk of the court in which the suit or action is pending, together with the original process, notice or demand, a copy of the notice the secretary of state sent to the defendant cooperative and the secretary of state's affidavit setting forth the secretary of state's compliance with this section. Upon receipt thereof, the clerk shall copy the affidavit on the rule docket of the court and shall mark it, the receipt or refused or undelivered mail, and the copy of notice as of the day received and place them in the file of the suit or action where the process and pleadings are kept, and such receipt or refused or undelivered mail, affidavit and a copy of the notice shall be and become a part of the technical record in the suit or action, and thereupon service on the defendant shall be complete. Service made under this section shall have the same legal force and validity as if the service had been made personally in this state.

Subsequent pleadings or papers permitted or required to be served on the defendant domestic cooperative may be served on the secretary of state as agent for the defendant cooperative in the same manner, at the same cost and with the same effect as process, notice or demand are served on the secretary of state as agent for the defendant cooperative under this section.

No appearance shall be required in the suit or action by the defendant domestic cooperative, nor shall any judgment be taken against the defendant domestic cooperative, in less than one (1) month after the date service is completed under this section.

The secretary of state shall keep a record of all processes, notices and demands served upon the secretary of state under this section, which record shall include the time of such service and the secretary of state's action with reference thereto.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 8.

43-38-112. Fees and taxes.

Cooperatives created pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to the same fees and taxed in the same manner as nonprofit cooperative associations established pursuant to chapter 16 of this title.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 10.

43-38-113. Powers of cooperative.

In addition to the other powers listed in this section, unless the articles of organization provide otherwise, a cooperative as an agent or otherwise:

May perform every act and thing necessary or proper to the conduct of the cooperative's business or the accomplishment of the purposes of the cooperative;

Has other rights, powers, or privileges granted by the laws of this state to other cooperatives, except those that are inconsistent with the express provisions of this chapter; and

Has the powers given in this section.

A cooperative may:

Buy, sell, or deal in its own products, the products of the cooperative's individual members, patrons or nonmembers, the products of another cooperative association, or of its members or patrons, or the products of another person or entity. A cooperative may negotiate the price at which the products the cooperative is selling may be sold;

Enter into or become a party to a contract or agreement for the cooperative or for the cooperative's individual members or patrons or between the cooperative and its members;

Purchase and hold, lease, mortgage, encumber, sell, exchange and convey as a legal entity real estate, buildings and personal property as the business of the cooperative may require, including the sale or other disposition of assets required by the business of the cooperative as determined by the board;

Erect buildings or other structures or facilities on the cooperative's owned or leased property or on a right-of-way legally acquired by the cooperative;

Issue bonds or other evidence of indebtedness and may borrow money to finance the business of the cooperative;

Make advances to the cooperative's members or patrons on products delivered by the members or patrons to the cooperative;

Accept deposits of money from other cooperatives, associations or members from which it is constituted;

Loan or borrow money to or from individual members, cooperatives or associations from which it is constituted with security that it considers sufficient in dealing with the members, cooperatives, or associations;

Purchase, acquire, hold, or dispose of the ownership interests of another business entity, whether organized under the laws of this state or another state, and assume all rights, interests, privileges, responsibilities and obligations arising out of the ownership interests;

Acquire and hold ownership interests in another business entity organized under the laws of this state or another state of the United States, including a business entity organized:

As a federation of associations;

For the purpose of forming a district, state, or national marketing, sales or service agency; or

For the purpose of acquiring marketing facilities at terminal or other markets in this state or other states;

Purchase, own, and hold ownership interests, including stock and other equity interests, memberships, interests in nonstock capital, evidences of indebtedness of any domestic business entity when reasonably necessary or incidental to accomplish the purposes stated in the articles;

Exercise any and all fiduciary powers in relations with members, cooperatives, associations or business entities from which it is constituted;

Take, receive, and hold real and personal property, including the principal and interest of money or other funds and rights in a contract, in trust for any purpose not inconsistent with the purposes of the cooperative in its articles and may exercise fiduciary powers in relation to taking, receiving, and holding the real and personal property;

Sue and be sued, complain and defend in its corporate name;

Have a corporate seal, which may be altered at will, and use it, or a facsimile of it, by impressing or affixing it or in any other manner reproducing it;

Make and amend bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of organization or with the laws of this state, for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the cooperative;

Make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific or educational purposes;

Make payments or donations, or do any other act, not inconsistent with law, that furthers the business and affairs of the cooperative;

Procure insurance on the life of the directors, officers, and employees of the cooperative;

Accept gifts; and

Accept contributions under § 43-38-501.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 11.

43-38-114. Marketing contracts.

A cooperative and its patron member or patron may make and execute a marketing contract, requiring the patron member or patron to sell a specified portion of the patron member's or patron's agricultural product or specified commodity produced from a certain area exclusively to or through the cooperative or facility established by the cooperative.

If a sale is contracted to the cooperative, the sale shall transfer title to the product absolutely, except for a recorded lien or security interest, to the cooperative on delivery of the product or at another specified time if expressly provided in the contract. The contract may allow the cooperative to sell or resell the product of its patron member or patron with or without taking title to the product, and to pay the resale price to the patron member or patron, after deducting all necessary selling, overhead and other costs and expenses, including other proper reserves and interest.

A single term of a marketing contract shall not exceed ten (10) years, but a marketing contract may be made self-renewing for periods not exceeding five (5) years each, subject to the right of either party to terminate by giving written notice of the termination during a period of the current term as specified in the contract.

The bylaws or the marketing contract, or both, may set a specific sum as liquidated damages to be paid by the patron member or patron to the cooperative for breach of any provision of the marketing contract regarding the sale or delivery or withholding of a product and may provide that the member or patron shall pay the costs, premiums for bonds, expenses and fees if an action is brought on the contract by the cooperative. The remedies for breach of contract are valid and enforceable in the courts of this state. The provisions shall be enforced as liquidated damages and are not to be considered or regarded as a penalty.

If there is a breach or threatened breach of a marketing contract by a patron member or patron, the cooperative is entitled to an injunction to prevent the further breach of the contract and to a decree of specific performance of the contract. Pending the adjudication of the action after filing a certified complaint showing the breach or threatened breach and filing a sufficient bond, the cooperative is entitled to a temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction against the patron member or patron.

Any person who knowingly induces or attempts to induce any member or patron of a cooperative organized under this chapter to breach a marketing contract with the cooperative, or who maliciously and knowingly spreads false reports about the finances or management of the finances, shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor and subject to a fine only of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), for each such offense; provided however, that this section shall not apply to a bona fide creditor of such cooperative, or the agent or attorney of any such bona fide creditor, endeavoring to make collections of the indebtedness.

In addition to the penalty provided in subsection (f), the person, corporation or other entity may be liable to the cooperative for civil damages for any violation of subsection (f). Each violation shall constitute a separate offense and is subject to the penalties in this subsection (g) and subsection (f).

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 12.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

43-38-115. Unclaimed property.

A cooperative may, in lieu of paying or delivering to the state the unclaimed property specified in its report of unclaimed property, distribute the unclaimed property to a corporation or organization that is exempt from taxation. A cooperative making the election to distribute unclaimed property shall file with the secretary of state:

A verified written explanation of the proof of claim of an owner establishing a right to receive the abandoned property;

Any error in the presumption of abandonment;

The name, address, and exemption number of the corporation or organization to which the property was or is to be distributed; and

The approximate date of distribution.

This section does not alter the procedure provided by law for cooperatives to report unclaimed property to the state and the requirement that claims of owners are made to the cooperatives for a period following the publication of lists of abandoned property.

The right of an owner to unclaimed property held by a cooperative is extinguished when the property is disbursed by the cooperative to a tax-exempt organization in accordance with this section.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 12.

43-38-116. Challenge of cooperative action.

Except as provided in subsection (b), the validity of a cooperative's action may not be challenged on the ground that the cooperative lacks or lacked the power to act.

A cooperative power to act may be challenged in a proceeding by:

A member against the cooperative to enjoin the act;

The cooperative directly, derivatively, or through a receiver, trustee, or other legal representative, against an incumbent or former director, officer, employee or agent of the cooperative; or

The attorney general and reporter under § 43-38-1017.

In a member's proceeding under subdivision (b)(1) to enjoin an unauthorized cooperative act, the court may enjoin or set aside the act, if equitable and if all affected persons are parties to the proceeding, and may award damages for loss, other than anticipated profits, suffered by the cooperative or another party because of enjoining the unauthorized act.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 13.

43-38-117. Limitation of liability.

Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f), a member, holder of financial interest, director, officer, employee or other agent of a cooperative does not have any personal obligation and is not otherwise personally liable for the acts, debts, liabilities, or obligations of the cooperative, whether they arise in contract, tort or otherwise.

A member, holder of financial interest, director, officer, employee or other agent of a cooperative does not have any personal obligation and is not otherwise personally liable for the acts or omissions of any other member, officer, director, employee or other agent of the cooperative.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a member, holder of financial interest, director, officer, employee or other agent may become personally liable in contract, tort or otherwise by reason of that person's own acts or conduct.

The limited liability described in subsection (a) continues in full force regardless of any dissolution, winding up, and termination of a cooperative.

A member, holder of financial interest, director, or officer of a cooperative is not a proper party to a proceeding by or against a cooperative except:

Where the object of the proceeding is to enforce the person's right against or liability to the cooperative;

In a derivative action brought pursuant to this chapter, the articles or the bylaws; or

Where the proceeding asserts personal liability of the member, holder of financial interest, director or officer described in subdivision (a)(3).

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, each person, member, or employee required to collect or truthfully account for, and pay over to the department of revenue any tax collected from the customers of a cooperative shall be personally liable for such taxes in the manner as responsible persons of a corporation under § 67-1-1443.

The failure of a cooperative to observe the usual company formalities or requirements relating to the exercise of its cooperative powers or management of its business is not a ground for imposing personal liability upon the members, directors, officers, employees or other agents of the cooperative.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the articles may provide that one (1) or more specifically identified members, as named in the articles, shall be personally liable for all of the debts, obligations and liabilities of the cooperative, and, if so, each such specifically identified member shall be liable to the same extent as a general partner in a general partnership; provided however, that:

In order to be effective, each member so identified must sign the articles, or an amendment to the articles containing this provision; and

Each member shall continue to be personally liable for debts, obligations and liabilities of the cooperative until the articles are amended to strike such member's name, but the amendment must be signed by the chief manager or secretary and any remaining members who continue to be identified in the articles as being personally liable for the debts, obligations and liabilities of the cooperative.

A member who is identified in the articles as being personally liable has the power to withdraw from the cooperative by filing an amendment to the articles stating that the member has withdrawn from the cooperative and shall not be liable for any future debts, obligations and liabilities of the cooperative; provided, that such an amendment to the articles shall be effective immediately, except with respect to parties that have reasonably relied upon the articles naming the person as individually liable for the debts, obligations and liabilities of the cooperative.

An amendment to the articles filed pursuant to subdivisions (f)(1) and (f)(2) is not effective against parties reasonably relying upon the articles until the passage of ninety (90) days from the filing of the amendment to the articles. Notwithstanding this subdivision (f)(3), the member or former member will continue to be liable for all debts and obligations of the cooperative incurred by the cooperative while the member assumed liability.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 16.

43-38-118. Required records and information.

A cooperative shall keep at its principal executive office, or at another place or places within the United States determined by the board:

A current list of the full names and last-known business, residence or mailing addresses of the chief manager, secretary and each member and governor;

A current list of the full name and last-known business, residence, or mailing address of each assignee of financial rights and a description of the rights assigned;

A copy of the articles and all amendments to the articles;

Copies of the currently effective bylaws and any agreements concerning classes or series of membership interests;

Copies of the cooperative's federal, state, and local income tax returns and reports, if any, for the three (3) most recent years;

Financial statements required by § 43-38-119 and accounting records of the cooperative;

Records of all proceedings of members, if any;

Any written consents obtained from members under this chapter;

Records of all proceedings of the board of directors for the last three (3) years;

A statement of all contributions accepted under § 43-38-501, the identity of the contribution and the agreed value of the contribution;

A copy of all contribution agreements and contribution allowance agreements; and

A copy of the cooperative's most recent annual report delivered to the secretary of state under § 43-38-120.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 23.

43-38-119. Preparation of annual reports.

A cooperative shall prepare financial statements at least annually, which may be consolidated or combined statements of the cooperative and one (1) or more of its subsidiaries, as appropriate, that include a balance sheet as of the end of the reporting period and an income statement for that period. If financial statements are prepared for the cooperative on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles, the financial statements of any subsidiary must also be prepared on that basis. If requested in writing by any member or holder of financial rights, the cooperative shall furnish the statements to such person as set out in subsection (c).

If the annual financial statements are reported by a public accountant, the accountant's report must accompany them. If not, the statements must be accompanied by a statement of the chief manager or the person responsible for the cooperative's accounting records:

Stating that person's reasonable belief whether the statements were prepared on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles and, if not, describing the basis of preparation; and

Describing any respects in which the statements were not prepared on a basis for accounting consistent with the statements prepared for the preceding year.

A cooperative shall mail the annual financial statements to each requesting member or holder of financial rights, within one (1) month after notice of the request; provided however, that with respect to the financial statements for the most recently completed fiscal year, the statements shall be mailed to the member within four (4) months after the close of the fiscal year.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 23.